Mississippi statutes. Title 95. Torts
Chapter 1. Libel and Slander

§ 95-1-1.
Certain words actionable.

All words which, from their usual construction and common acceptation, are considered as insults, and calculated to lead to a breach of the peace, shall be actionable; and a plea, exception or demurrer shall not be sustained to preclude a jury from passing thereon, who are the sole judges of the damages sustained; but this shall not deprive the courts of the power to grant new trials, as in other cases.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 56, art. 3; 1857, ch. 54, art. 1; 1871, § 1973; 1880, § 1004; 1892, § 10; 1906, § 10; Hemingway’s 1917, § 1; 1930, § 11; 1942, § 1059.

§ 95-1-3.
Liability of radio and television stations or networks.

The owner, licensee or operator of a visual or sound radio broadcasting station or network of stations, and the agents or employees of any such owner, licensee or operator, shall not be liable for any damages for any defamatory statement published or uttered in or as a part of a visual or sound radio broadcast, by any person other than the owner, licensee or operator, or some agent or employee thereof.

In no event, however, shall any owner, licensee or operator, or the agents or employees of any such owner, licensee or operator of such a station or network of stations, be held liable for any damages for any defamatory statement uttered over the facilities of such station or network by or on behalf of any candidate for public office, unless such statement is made by an agent or employee of the station in the course of his employment.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1059.5; Laws, 1954, ch. 250, §§ 1, 2.

§ 95-1-5.
Newspapers and radio or television stations to have opportunity to make corrections prior to suit.

Before any civil action is brought for publication, in a newspaper domiciled and published in this state or authorized to do business in Mississippi so as to be subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state, of a libel, or against any radio or television station domiciled in this state, the plaintiff shall, at least ten (10) days before instituting any such action, serve notice in writing on the defendant at its regular place of business, specifying the article, broadcast or telecast, and the statements therein, which he alleges to be false and defamatory.

If it appears upon the trial that said article was published, broadcast or telecast in good faith, that its falsity was due to an honest mistake of the facts, and there were reasonable grounds for believing that the statements in said article, broadcast or telecast were true, and that within ten (10) days after the service of said notice a full and fair correction, apology and retraction was published in the same edition or corresponding issues of the newspaper in which said article appeared, and in as conspicuous place and type as was said original article, or was broadcast or telecast under like conditions correcting an honest mistake, and if the jury shall so find, the plaintiff in such case shall recover only actual damages. The burden of proof of the foregoing facts shall be affirmative defenses of the defendant and pled as such.

This section shall not apply to any publication concerning a candidate for public office made within ten (10) days of any primary, general or special election in which such candidate’s candidacy for or election to public office is to be determined, and this section shall not apply to any editorial or to any regularly published column in which matters of opinions are expressed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 1059.7; Laws, 1962, ch. 318, §§ 1-4.